Hawaii, session 2026, HB2530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Calculating student-to-teacher ratios. (a) The optimal class size for department schools as determined by department policy or collective bargaining shall be calculated by the following method: (1)  The calculation shall be based on the amount of classroom teachers only and shall not include school librarians, counselors, registrars, and special education teachers, when they are not the sole classroom instructor; and (2)  Schools shall calculate the student-to-teacher ratio based on the total amount of students and teachers in each classroom rather than total student school enrollment. (b)  In the event that the student-to-teacher ratio cannot be met, schools must notify parents and guardians for the rationale of any changes. (c)  The department shall implement this policy to ensure that instructional personnel and other staff are allocated in a manner that is educationally sound, instructionally appropriate, informative to parents and guardians, consistent with available funding, and provides for an equitable teacher workload." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________